Rhode Island, session 2025, HB6406.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 21-28.9-4 of the General Laws in Chapter 21-28.9 entitled "The Good
Samaritan Overdose Prevention Act of 2016" is hereby amended to read as follows:
21-28.9-4. Emergency overdose care — Immunity from legal repercussions.
(a) Any person who, in good faith, without malice and in the absence of evidence of an
intent to defraud, seeks medical assistance for someone experiencing a drug or alcohol overdose or
other drug- or alcohol-related medical emergency shall not be charged or prosecuted for any crime
related to the possession of a controlled substance or drug paraphernalia, or the operation of a drug-
involved premises, if the evidence for the charge was gained as a result of the seeking of medical
assistance.
(b) A person who experiences a drug or alcohol overdose or other drug- or alcohol-related
medical emergency and is in need of medical assistance shall not be charged or prosecuted for any
crime related to the possession of a controlled substance or drug paraphernalia, possession or
transportation of alcohol by an underage person, or the operation of a drug-involved premises, if
the evidence for the charge was gained as a result of the overdose and the need for medical
assistance.
(c) The act of providing first aid or other medical assistance to someone who is
experiencing a drug or alcohol overdose or other drug- or alcohol-related medical emergency may
be used as a mitigating factor in a criminal prosecution pursuant to the controlled substances act.

(d) The immunity related to the possession of a controlled substance or drug paraphernalia,
possession or transportation of alcohol by an underage person, or the operation of a drug-involved
premises afforded under this section shall also extend to a violation of bail, probation and/or parole
on those grounds.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC002994
========
LC002994 - Page 2 of 3